Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB402.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 154.12-223 is amended to read as follows:
(1) There is created within the Cabinet for Economic Development the Department for
Business and Community Development, which shall be headed by a commissioner
appointed by the Governor. The department shall work with each Kentucky county
and community in:
(a) Providing customer service and project management with new and existing
industries;
(b) Overseeing programs and initiatives designed to support new investment, job
creation, and retention across the state;
(c) Providing sufficient technical resources to create and maintain a database to
facilitate sales transactions between Kentucky businesses;
(d) Administering activities related to business site selection; and
(e) Collaborating with community partners and other agencies on workforce and
economic development opportunities.
(2) The department shall include the following divisions, each of which shall be headed
by a director appointed by the secretary pursuant to KRS 12.050:
(a) The Development and Retention Division – West Kentucky;
(b) The Development, Retention, and Administrative Division – Central and East
Kentucky; and
(c) The Community and Workforce Development Division.
(3) The department shall establish the following positions, each of which shall be
tasked with industry recruitment and job creation in order to promote
development in areas affected by the declining coal industry:
(a) The Western Coal Field project manager; and
(b) The Eastern Coal Field project manager.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 2/6/2025 4:44 PM Jacketed